Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-914
Application for medical assistance; form; department; decision; notice; requirements; appeal.

(1) An applicant for medical assistance shall file an application with the department in a manner and form prescribed by the department. The department shall process each application to determine whether the applicant is eligible for medical assistance. The department shall provide a determination of eligibility for medical assistance in a timely manner in compliance with 42 C.F.R. 435.911, including, but not limited to, a timely determination of eligibility for coverage of an emergency medical condition, such as labor and delivery.

(2) The department shall notify an applicant for or recipient of medical assistance of any decision of the department to deny or discontinue eligibility or to deny or modify medical assistance. Except in the case of an emergency, the notice shall be mailed on the same day as or the day after the decision is made. In addition to mailing the notice, the department may also deliver the notice by any form of electronic communication if the department has the agreement of the recipient to receive such notice by means of such form of electronic communication. Decisions of the department, including the failure of the department to act with reasonable promptness, may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(3) Notice of a decision to discontinue eligibility or to modify medical assistance shall include an explanation of the proposed action, the reason for the proposed action, the information used to make the decision including specific regulations or laws requiring such action, contact information for personnel of the department to address questions regarding the action, information on the right to appeal, and an explanation of the availability of continued benefits pending such appeal.

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 14;

Laws 2011, LB494, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB956, § 3.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.